Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1658.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 3, Chapter 291, O.S.L.
2024 (59 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 538.3), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 538.3. A. A laser practitioner shall only perform
laser hair removal using lasers or pulsed light devices approved by
the United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA) for noninvasive
procedures.
B. A person shall not perform or attempt to perform laser hair
removal unless the person holds the appropriate health professional
license or certificate as defined in Section 2 538.2 of this act
title, or the person is a laser practitioner performing laser hair
removal under the supervision of a physician as defined in
paragraphs 1 through 6 of subsection A of Section 725.2 of this
title, a certified physician assistant, or a certified Advanced
Practice Registered Nurse. A laser practitioner who is not a

physician shall complete a laser practitioner training and education
program. A laser training and education program may be completed
internally at the laser hair removal facility or via a third party,
provided such third-party program is overseen by a physician. A
laser practitioner training and education program shall include
forty (40) total hours of training, which may be a combination of
didactic training, in-person hands-on training, and performance of
laser hair removal procedures.
C. A laser hair removal facility shall be overseen by a
physician; provided, that Advanced Practice Registered Nurses shall
be exempt from this oversight requirement, as defined in paragraphs
1 through 6 of subsection A of Section 725.2 of this title, a
certified physician assistant, or a certified Advanced Practice
Registered Nurse.
D. The overseeing physician shall:
1. Establish proper protocols for laser hair removal provided
at a facility including, but not limited to, complication
management. A laser practitioner shall follow all written procedure
protocols established and revised by the overseeing physician. Such
protocols shall require utilizing a physician, physician assistant,
or Advanced Practice Registered Nurse for complication management;
2. Determine the number of laser practitioners under such
physician's supervision; and
3. Review not less than ten percent (10%) of laser hair removal
patient records.
Every physician or physician assistant or Advanced Practice
Registered Nurse shall establish a relationship with patients which
shall include an initial evaluation, prior to treatment, that is
either face-to-face or via telemedicine that is performed by the
physician or physician assistant or Advanced Practice Registered
Nurse.
As part of the patient relationship, each physician or certified
physician assistant or certified Advanced Practice Registered Nurse
shall create a patient chart. The chart shall contain an informed
consent, a treatment plan that includes risks, benefits,
alternatives, follow-up, and care for potential complications.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1658 Page 2

E. A physician shall not be required to be physically present
or to supervise laser hair removal, but shall be available for
communication during the procedure, either in person or by two-way,
real time interactive communication.
F. A laser practitioner may perform laser hair removal on a
patient without the prior evaluation or referral of such patient by
a physician.
G. The conduct of allopathic physicians and physician
assistants pursuant to this act shall be regulated by the State
Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision. The conduct of
osteopathic physicians pursuant to this act shall be regulated by
the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners. The conduct of Registered
Nurses, Licensed Practical Nurses, and Advanced Practice Registered
Nurses pursuant to this act shall be regulated by the Oklahoma Board
of Nursing.
H. G. Nothing in this act shall prohibit any person in the
healing arts, in this state, under any other act, from engaging in
the practice for which he or she is duly licensed.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1658 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 25th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 7th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1658 Page 4